Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1656.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2051 of Title 25, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The purpose of this act is to protect every person’s right


to exercise medical freedom, personal autonomy, and personal bodily


privacy.


B. Every person shall have the right to refuse any vaccine,


medication, microchip, external tracker, or any other manufactured


product.


C. No person shall be mandated by the state, a political


subdivision, an educational institution, an employer, a business, or

Req. No. 2381 Page 1


any other public or private entity to receive, purchase, or consent


to any vaccine, medication, microchip, external tracker, or any


other manufactured product as a condition of receiving public


services, admittance to an educational institution, employment,


consumer goods or services, access to a place of public


accommodation, or any other privilege or right.


D. A person or entity who violates subsection C of this section


or otherwise infringes on the right conferred by subsection B of


this section shall be liable in a civil action. The court shall


award a prevailing plaintiff any appropriate relief including, but


not limited to, injunctive relief, declaratory relief, compensatory


damages, punitive damages, costs, and reasonable attorney fees.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2381 DC 1/13/2026 9:00:20 PM













Req. No. 2381 Page 2